Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PROVISIONS AFFECTING STUDENTS

A. Student
Performance Standards

§302A-201 Statewide performance
standards. The board shall establish statewide performance standards and
the means to assess the standards based upon the recommendations in the final
report of the performance standards commission established pursuant to Act 334,
Session Laws of Hawaii 1991; provided that the board may review and modify the
performance standards, as the board deems necessary, to reflect the needs of
public school students and educational goals adopted by the board. [L 1996, c
89, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 197, §1; am L 2009, c 33, §2; am L 2011, c 133, §§3,
5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next